California, session 20252026, AB30.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 43013.7 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:43013.7. (a) Notwithstanding Section 43830.8, blends of gasoline containing 10.5 percent to 15 percent ethanol by volume may be sold in the state for use as a transportation fuel until both of the following occur:(1) The California Environmental Policy Council completes its review and publicly posts its findings of the multimedia evaluation for blends of gasoline containing 10.5 percent to 15 percent ethanol by volume required pursuant to Section 43830.8.(2) The state board does either of the following:(A) Adopts a regulation establishing a specification for blends of gasoline containing 10.5 percent to 15 percent ethanol by volume.(B) Posts an assessment on its internet website demonstrating that it is not possible for a proposed regulation establishing a specification for blends of gasoline containing 10.5 percent to 15 percent ethanol by volume to meet the requirements of subdivision (f) of Section 43830.8.(b) This section shall not be construed to limit the authority of the state board to adopt and enforce transportation fuel specifications for other fuels, or for blends of gasoline containing 10.5 percent to 15 percent ethanol by volume after the state board takes action pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to develop solutions to help reduce the price of gasoline in California as soon as possible, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.